Utah statutes.
19-3-302.   Legislative intent.
(1) (a)  The state of Utah enacts this part to prevent the placement of any
high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste in Utah.
The state also recognizes that high-level nuclear waste or greater than class
C radioactive waste may be placed within the exterior boundaries of the state,
pursuant to a license from the federal government, or by the federal
government itself, in violation of this state law.
(b)  Due to this possibility, the state also enacts provisions in this part to
regulate transportation, transfer, storage, decay in storage, treatment, and
disposal of any high-level nuclear waste and greater than class C radioactive
waste in Utah, thereby asserting and protecting the state's interests in
environmental and economic resources consistent with 42 U.S.C.A. 2011 et seq.,
Atomic Energy Act and 42 U.S.C.A. 10101 et seq., Nuclear Waste Policy Act,
should the federal government decide to authorize any entity to operate, or
operate itself, in violation of this state law.
(2)  Neither the Atomic Energy Act nor the Nuclear Waste Policy Act provides
for siting a large privately owned high-level nuclear waste transfer, storage,
decay in storage, or treatment facility away from the vicinity of the
reactors.  The Atomic Energy Act and the Nuclear Waste Policy Act specifically
define authorized storage and disposal programs and activities.  The state of
Utah in enacting this part is not preempted by federal law, since any proposed
facilities that would be sited in Utah are not contemplated or authorized by
federal law and, in any circumstance, this part is not contrary to or
inconsistent with federal law or Congressional intent.
(3)  The state of Utah has environmental and economic interests which do not
involve nuclear safety regulation, and which must be considered and complied
with in siting a high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive
waste transfer, storage, decay in storage, treatment, or disposal facility and
in transporting these wastes in the state.
(4)  An additional primary purpose of this part is to ensure protection of the
state from nonradiological hazards associated with any waste transportation,
transfer, storage, decay in storage, treatment, or disposal.
(5)  The state recognizes the sovereign rights of Indian tribes within the
state of Utah.  However, any proposed transfer, storage, decay in storage,
treatment, or disposal facility located on a reservation which directly
affects and impacts state interests by creating off-reservation effects such
as potential or actual degradation of soils and groundwater, potential or
actual contamination of surface water, pollution of the ambient air, emergency
planning costs, impacts on development, agriculture, and ranching, and
increased transportation activity, is subject to state jurisdiction.
(6)  There is no tradition of regulation by the Indian tribes in Utah of high-
level nuclear waste or higher than class C radioactive waste.  The state does
have a long history of regulation of radioactive sources and natural resources
and in the transfer, storage, treatment, and transportation of materials and
wastes throughout the state.  The state finds that its interests are even
greater when nonmembers of an Indian tribe propose to locate a facility on
tribal trust lands primarily to avoid state regulation and state authorities
under federal law.
(7) (a)  This part is not intended to modify existing state requirements for
obtaining environmental approvals, permits, and licenses, including surface
and groundwater permits and air quality permits, when the permits are
necessary under state and federal law to construct and operate a high-level
nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste transfer, storage,
decay in storage, treatment, or disposal facility.
(b)  Any source of air pollution proposed to be located within the state,
including sources located within the boundaries of an Indian reservation,
which will potentially or actually have a direct and significant impact on
ambient air within the state, is required to obtain an approval order and
permit from the state under Section 19-2-108.
(c)  Any facility which will potentially or actually have a significant impact
on the state's surface or groundwater resources is required to obtain a permit
under Section 19-5-107 even if located within the boundaries of an Indian
reservation.
(8)  The state finds that the transportation, transfer, storage, decay in
storage, treatment, and disposal of high-level nuclear waste and greater than
class C radioactive waste within the state is an ultra-hazardous activity
which carries with it the risk that any release of waste may result in
enormous economic and human injury.
